Utah statutes.
57-4a-2.   Recorded document imparts notice of contents despite defects.
A recorded document imparts notice of its contents regardless of any defect,
irregularity, or omission in its execution, attestation, or acknowledgment.  A
certified copy of a recorded document is admissible as evidence to the same
extent the original document would be admissible as evidence.
